Washington statutes.
RCW 18.290.100

Prohibited practices.

(1) Except as provided in RCW 18.290.030, no person shall engage in the practice of genetic counseling unless he or she is licensed, or provisionally licensed, under this chapter.

(2) A person not licensed with the secretary to practice genetic counseling may not represent himself or herself as a "licensed genetic counselor or a genetic counselor."

[ 2009 c 302 s 11.]